pt-PT: Artigos de mobiliário de exterior incluídos: Cama; Banco; Cadeiras; Otomano; Sofá seccional; Sofá; Caixa de armazenamento; Espreguiçadeira; Mesa; Outro
ru: Состав комплекта садовой мебели: Кровать; Лавка; Стулья; Пуфик; Секционный диван; Диван; Ящик для хранения; Шезлонг; Стол; Другое
da: Udendørs møbelartikler medfølger: Seng; Bænk; Stole; Ottoman; Sektionssofa; Sofa; Opbevaringskasse; Sunlounger; Bord; Andet
nl: Meubels voor buiten inbegrepen: Bed; Bank; Stoelen; Poef; Sectionele bank; Sofa; Opslagdoos; Ligstoel; Tafel; Andere
fr: Articles de mobilier d’extérieur inclus: Lit; Banc; Fauteuils; Pouf; Canapé sectionnel; Canapé; Boîte de rangement; Transat; Table; Autre
th: รวมเฟอร์นิเจอร์กลางแจ้ง: เตียง; ม้านั่ง; เก้าอี้; ออตโตมัน; โซฟากลุ่ม; โซฟา; กล่องเก็บของ; เตียงอาบแดด; โต๊ะ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vključeno zunanje pohištvo: Postelja; Klop; Stoli; Otomana; Sekcijski kavč; Kavč; Škatla za shranjevanje; Ležalnik; Miza; Drugo
zh-CN: 包含户外家具用品: 床; 长椅; 椅子; 搁脚凳; 组合沙发; 沙发; 储物盒; 躺椅; 桌子; 其他
fi: Mukana ulkokalusteet: Sänky; Penkki; Tuolit; Ottomaanit; Sohvamoduulit; Sohva; Säilytyslaatikko; Aurinkotuoli; Pöytä; Muu
hu: Mellékelt kültéri bútordarabok: Ágy; Pad; Székek; Dívány; Szekcionált kanapé; Kanapé; Tárolódoboz; Napozóágy; Asztal; Egyéb
ko: 아웃도어 가구 품목 포함: 침대; 벤치; 의자; 오토만; 분리형 개별 소파; 소파; 수납 상자; 일광욕 의자; 테이블; 기타
de: Gartenmöbel inklusive: Bett; Bank; Stühle; Kastenbett; Anbausofa; Sofa; Aufbewahrungskiste; Sonnenliege; Tisch; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Включени елементи за външно обзавеждане: Легло; Пейка; Столове; Табуретка; Секционен диван; Диван; Кутия за съхранение; Шезлонг; Маса; Други
es: Artículos de muebles de exterior incluidos: Cama; Banco; Sillas; Otomana; Sofá seccional; Sofá; Caja de almacenamiento; Tumbona; Mesa; Otros
tr: Dış mekan mobilyaları dahildir: Yatak; Bank; Sandalyeler; Sedir; Seksiyonel kanepe; Kanepe; Depolama Kutusu; Şezlong; Masa; Diğer
en: Outdoor furniture items included: Bed; Bench; Chairs; Ottoman; Sectional sofa; Sofa; Storage box; Sunlounger; Table; Other
ja: 屋外家具付き: ベッド; ベンチ; 椅子; オットマン; 組み合わせ式ソファー; ソファ; 収納ボックス; サンラウンジャー; テーブル; その他
cs: Obsažené součásti venkovního nábytku: Postel; Lavice; Židle; Otomany; Sektorová pohovka; Gauč; Úložný box; Lehátko; Stůl; Jiné
zh-TW: 包括戶外家具品項: 床; 長椅; 椅子; 掀床; 組合沙發; 沙發; 收納盒; 躺椅; 桌子; 其他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται έπιπλα εξωτερικού χώρου: Κρεβάτι; Πάγκος; Καρέκλες; Κάθισμα με μαξιλάρι; Καναπές σε κομμάτια; Καναπές; Κουτί αποθήκευσης; Ξαπλώστρα; Τραπέζι; Άλλο
pl: Meble zewnętrzne w zestawie: Łóżko; Stanowisko testowe; Krzesła i fotele; Otomana; Sofa modułowa; Sofa; Szafka do przechowywania; Leżak do opalania; Tabela; Inne
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi vanjskog namještaja: Krevet; Klupa; Stolice; Otoman; Sekcijski kauč; Kauč; Kutija za pohranu; Ležaljka za sunčanje; Stol; Ostalo
sk-SK: Vrátane vonkajšieho nábytku: Posteľ; Lavička; Stoličky; Otoman; Sekčná pohovka; Pohovka; Úložný box; Lehátko; Stôl; Iné
vi: Đi kèm đồ nội thất ngoài trời: Giường; Ghế dài; Ghế; Giường Ottoman; Ghế sofa nhiều chỗ ngồi; Ghế sofa; Hộp đựng đồ; Ghế tắm nắng; Bàn; Khác
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys lauko baldai: Lova; Suoliukas; Kėdės; Tachta; Modulinė sofa; Sofa; Sandėliavimo dėžė; Gultas; Stalas; Kita
it: Articoli di arredo per esterni inclusi: Letto; Panca; Sedie; Ottoman; Divano componibile; Divano; Scatola portaoggetti; Sunlounger; Tavolo; Altro
ro-RO: Articole de mobilier pentru exterior incluse: Pat; Bancă; Scaune; Taburet; Canapea modulară; Canapea; Cutie de depozitare; Sezlong; Masă; Altele
nb: Utemøbler inkludert: Seng; Benk; Stoler; Puffer; Seksjonssofa; Sofa; Oppbevaringsboks; Solseng; Bord; Annet
sv: Utomhusmöbelsartiklar som ingår: Säng; Bänk; Stolar; Ottoman; Sektionssoffa; Soffa; Förvaringslåda; Solstol; Bord; Övrigt
pt-BR: Itens de mobiliário de exterior incluídos: Cama; Banco; Cadeiras; Descanso para pés; Sofá modular; Sofá; Caixa para armazenamento; Espreguiçadeira; Mesa; Outro